Idaho, session 2026, H0789.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1430, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1430. THE COEUR D'ALENE TRIBE WATER RIGHTS SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT --
RATIFICATION AND AUTHORIZATION FOR IMPLEMENTATION. (1) As used in this sec-
tion:
(a) "The Coeur d'Alene tribe water rights settlement agreement of
2026" or "agreement" means the Coeur d'Alene tribe water rights settle-
ment agreement dated 2026, relating to CSRBA consolidated subcase No.
91-7755 in the CSRBA court.
(b) "CSRBA" means the Coeur d'Alene-Spokane river basin adjudication
litigation before the CSRBA court, In re CSRBA, No. 49576.
(c) "CSRBA court" means the district court of the fifth judicial dis-
trict of the state of Idaho, in and for the county of Twin Falls.
(2) The Coeur d'Alene tribe water rights settlement agreement of 2026
is hereby approved, ratified, and confirmed.
(3) The executive branch agencies or officers of the state with obli-
gations under the Coeur d'Alene tribe water rights settlement agreement of
2026 shall execute and perform all actions consistent with this section that
are necessary to implement the agreement.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1765B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1765B. COEUR D'ALENE-SPOKANE RIVER BASIN -- COEUR D'ALENE TRIBAL
WATER SUPPLY BANK. (1) The water resource board shall appoint a local
rental committee to facilitate operation of a water supply bank for the
off-reservation lease and rental of consumptive use federal reserved wa-
ter rights held by or on behalf of the Coeur d'Alene tribe within the Coeur
d'Alene-Spokane river basin, which shall be known as the Coeur d'Alene
tribal water supply bank. Except as is inconsistent with this section, the
provisions of section 42-1765, Idaho Code, and the board's water supply bank


rules applicable to the operation of a storage water rental pool shall apply
to the operation of the tribal water supply bank for such leases and rentals.
(2) The local rental committee shall have authority to rent consumptive
use federal reserved water rights held by or on behalf of the Coeur d'Alene
tribe, including natural flow and ground water rights, between consent-
ing owners and consenting renters, for beneficial use outside of the Coeur
d'Alene Indian reservation.
(3) Consistent with applicable law, rights to the use of water for a
portion of the approved period of use under a consumptive use federal re-
served water right held by or on behalf of the Coeur d'Alene tribe may be
accepted into the water supply bank and rented out to satisfy any minimum
stream flow water right held by the water resource board.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.